Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 1 CONSUMER PROTECTION - GENERAL
6-1-108. Subpoenas - hearings - rules.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2023.] When the attorney general or a district attorney has reasonable cause to believe that a person, whether in this state or elsewhere, has engaged in or is engaging in a deceptive trade practice listed in section 6-1-105 or part 7 of this article 1, the attorney general or a district attorney, in addition to other powers conferred upon him or her by this article 1, may issue subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents, administer oaths, conduct hearings in aid of any investigation or inquiry, and prescribe such forms and promulgate such rules as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this article 1.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

When the attorney general or a district attorney has reasonable cause to believe that a person, whether in this state or elsewhere, has engaged in or is engaging in a deceptive trade practice listed in section 6-1-105 or part 7 or 13 of this article 1, the attorney general or a district attorney, in addition to other powers conferred upon the attorney general or a district attorney by this article 1, may issue subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents, administer oaths, conduct hearings in aid of any investigation or inquiry, and prescribe such forms and promulgate such rules as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this article 1.

Service of any notice or subpoena may be made in the manner prescribed by law or as provided in rule 4 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

If the records of a person who has been issued a subpoena are located outside this state, the person shall either:

Make them available to the attorney general or district attorney at a convenient location within this state; or

Pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the attorney general or district attorney, or his or her designee, to examine the records at the place where they are maintained.

The attorney general or district attorney may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect the records on behalf of the attorney general or district attorney.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 374, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-5.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 349, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) added, (SB 13-248), ch. 270, p. 1417, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1094), ch. 94, p. 264, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 17-1023), ch. 64, p. 204, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3465, § 5, effective July 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

Section 7(2) of chapter 483 (SB 21-190), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to conduct occurring on or after July 1, 2023.

Cross references:

For service of subpoena, see C.R.C.P. 45 (b).

6-1-109. Remedies.

If any person fails to cooperate with any investigation pursuant to section 6-1-107 or fails to obey any subpoena pursuant to section 6-1-108, the attorney general or a district attorney may apply to the appropriate district court for an appropriate order to effect the purposes of this article 1. The application shall state that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the order applied for is necessary to investigate a deceptive trade practice as defined in this article 1. If the court is satisfied that reasonable grounds exist, the court in its order may:

Grant injunctive relief restraining the sale or advertisement of any property by such person;

Require the attendance of or the production of documents by such person, or both;

Grant such other or further relief as may be necessary to obtain compliance by such person.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 374, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-6.

L. 77:

IP(1) amended, p. 349, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

IP(1) amended, (HB 18-1028), ch. 42, p. 467, § 1, effective March 15.

6-1-110. Restraining orders - injunctions - assurances of discontinuance.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2023.] Whenever the attorney general or a district attorney has cause to believe that a person has engaged in or is engaging in any deceptive trade practice listed in section 6-1-105 or part 7 of this article, the attorney general or district attorney may apply for and obtain, in an action in the appropriate district court of this state, a temporary restraining order or injunction, or both, pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure, prohibiting such person from continuing such practices, or engaging therein, or doing any act in furtherance thereof. The court may make such orders or judgments as may be necessary to prevent the use or employment by such person of any such deceptive trade practice or which may be necessary to completely compensate or restore to the original position of any person injured by means of any such practice or to prevent any unjust enrichment by any person through the use or employment of any deceptive trade practice.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

Whenever the attorney general or a district attorney has cause to believe that a person has engaged in or is engaging in any deceptive trade practice listed in section 6-1-105 or part 7 or 13 of this article 1, the attorney general or district attorney may apply for and obtain, in an action in the appropriate district court of this state, a temporary restraining order or injunction, or both, pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure, prohibiting the person from continuing the practices, or engaging therein, or doing any act in furtherance thereof. The court may make such orders or judgments as may be necessary to prevent the use or employment by the person of any such deceptive trade practice or that may be necessary to completely compensate or restore to the original position of any person injured by means of any such practice or to prevent any unjust enrichment by any person through the use or employment of any deceptive trade practice.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2023.] Where the attorney general or a district attorney has authority to institute a civil action or other proceeding pursuant to the provisions of this article, the attorney general or district attorney may accept, in lieu thereof or as a part thereof, an assurance of discontinuance of any deceptive trade practice listed in section 6-1-105 or part 7 of this article. Such assurance may include a stipulation for the voluntary payment by the alleged violator of the costs of investigation and any action or proceeding by the attorney general or a district attorney and any amount necessary to restore to any person any money or property that may have been acquired by such alleged violator by means of any such deceptive trade practice. Any such assurance of discontinuance accepted by the attorney general or a district attorney and any such stipulation filed with the court as a part of any such action or proceeding shall be a matter of public record unless the attorney general or the district attorney determines, at his or her discretion, that it will be confidential to the parties to the action or proceeding and to the court and its employees. Upon the filing of a civil action by the attorney general or a district attorney alleging that a confidential assurance of discontinuance or stipulation accepted pursuant to this subsection (2) has been violated, said assurance of discontinuance or stipulation shall thereupon be deemed a public record and open to inspection by any person. Proof by a preponderance of the evidence of a violation of any such assurance or stipulation shall constitute prima facie evidence of a deceptive trade practice for the purposes of any civil action or proceeding brought thereafter by the attorney general or a district attorney, whether a new action or a subsequent motion or petition in any pending action or proceeding.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

Where the attorney general or a district attorney has authority to institute a civil action or other proceeding pursuant to the provisions of this article 1, the attorney general or district attorney may accept, in lieu thereof or as a part thereof, an assurance of discontinuance of any deceptive trade practice listed in section 6-1-105 or part 7 or 13 of this article 1. The assurance may include a stipulation for the voluntary payment by the alleged violator of the costs of investigation and any action or proceeding by the attorney general or a district attorney and any amount necessary to restore to any person any money or property that may have been acquired by the alleged violator by means of any such deceptive trade practice. Any such assurance of discontinuance accepted by the attorney general or a district attorney and any such stipulation filed with the court as a part of any such action or proceeding is a matter of public record unless the attorney general or the district attorney determines, at the discretion of the attorney general or district attorney, that it will be confidential to the parties to the action or proceeding and to the court and its employees. Upon the filing of a civil action by the attorney general or a district attorney alleging that a confidential assurance of discontinuance or stipulation accepted pursuant to this subsection (2) has been violated, the assurance of discontinuance or stipulation becomes a public record and open to inspection by any person. Proof by a preponderance of the evidence of a violation of any such assurance or stipulation constitutes prima facie evidence of a deceptive trade practice for the purposes of any civil action or proceeding brought thereafter by the attorney general or a district attorney, whether a new action or a subsequent motion or petition in any pending action or proceeding.

When the attorney general or a district attorney shows by a preponderance of evidence that a mortgage broker, mortgage originator, mortgage lender, mortgage loan applicant, real estate broker, real estate agent, real estate appraiser, or closing agent, other than a person who provides closing or settlement services subject to regulation by the division of insurance, has continued to participate in the origination of mortgage loans in violation of section 38-40-105, C.R.S., after having been previously enjoined from practices in violation of such section, the attorney general or district attorney may, in addition to any other remedies, apply for and obtain, in the court that has previously issued an injunction, a further injunction against continuing to participate in the business of originating mortgage loans for up to five years.

In addition to any other remedy available under this section, when the attorney general or district attorney has cause to believe that a person has engaged in or is engaging in a deceptive trade practice described in section 6-1-720, the attorney general or district attorney may apply for and obtain, in an action in the appropriate district court of this state, an order forfeiting any tickets obtained, or the proceeds from the resale of any such tickets, in violation of section 6-1-720.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 374, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-7.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 349, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 446, § 4, effective April 17.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 358, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2) amended, p. 344, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 653, § 6, effective May 18.

L. 2002:

(3) added, p. 1603, § 4, effective June 7.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 1723, § 11, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(4) added, p. 2230, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3466, § 6, effective July 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

Section 7(2) of chapter 483 (SB 21-190), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to conduct occurring on or after July 1, 2023.

6-1-111. Information and evidence confidential and inadmissible - when.

Any testimony obtained by the attorney general or a district attorney pursuant to compulsory process under this article or any information derived directly or indirectly from such testimony shall not be admissible in evidence in any criminal prosecution against the person so compelled to testify. The provisions of this subsection (1) shall not be construed to prevent any law enforcement officer from independently producing or obtaining the same or similar facts, information, or evidence for use in any criminal prosecution.

Subject to the provisions of section 6-1-110 (2), the records of investigations or intelligence information of the attorney general or a district attorney obtained under this article may be deemed public records available for inspection by the general public at the discretion of the attorney general or the district attorney. This subsection (2) shall not be construed to prevent the attorney general or a district attorney from issuing public statements describing or warning of any course of conduct or any conspiracy which constitutes a deceptive trade practice, whether on a local, statewide, regional, or nationwide basis.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 375, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-8.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 350, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 401, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 88:

(2) amended, p. 344, § 5, effective July 1.

6-1-112. Civil penalties.

The attorney general or a district attorney may bring a civil action on behalf of the state to seek the imposition of civil penalties as follows:

Any person who violates or causes another to violate any provision of this article 1 shall forfeit and pay to the general fund of this state a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars for each such violation. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), a violation of any provision shall constitute a separate violation with respect to each consumer or transaction involved.

Any person who violates or causes another to violate any court order or injunction issued pursuant to this article shall forfeit and pay to the general fund of this state a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each such violation. For the purposes of this section, the court issuing the order or injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the cause shall be continued. Upon violation, the attorney general or a district attorney may petition the court for the recovery of the civil penalty. Such civil penalty shall be in addition to any other penalty or remedy available for the enforcement of the provisions of this article and any court order or injunction.

Any person who violates or causes another to violate any provision of this article 1, where such violation was committed against an elderly person, shall forfeit and pay to the general fund of the state a civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars for each such violation. For purposes of this subsection (1)(c), a violation of any provision of this article 1 is a separate violation with respect to each elderly person involved.

Any person who violates or causes another to violate the provisions of section 6-1-105 (1)(fff) by distributing, dispensing, displaying for sale, offering for sale, attempting to sell, or selling any product that is labeled as a "bath salt" or any other trademark if the product contains any amount of any cathinones, as defined in section 18-18-102 (3.5), C.R.S., shall forfeit and pay to the general fund of the state a civil penalty of not less than ten thousand dollars and not more than five hundred thousand dollars for each such violation; except that the person shall forfeit and pay to the general fund of the state a civil penalty of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars and not more than five hundred thousand dollars for each such violation if the person distributes, dispenses, displays for sale, offers for sale, attempts to sell, or sells the product to a minor under the age of eighteen and the person is at least eighteen years of age and at least two years older than the minor.

Any person who violates or causes another to violate the provisions of section 6-1-105 (1)(ggg) by distributing, dispensing, displaying for sale, offering for sale, attempting to sell, or selling any product that contains any amount of any synthetic cannabinoid, as defined in section 18-18-102 (34.5), C.R.S., shall forfeit and pay to the general fund of the state a civil penalty of not less than ten thousand dollars and not more than five hundred thousand dollars for each violation; except that the person shall forfeit and pay to the general fund of the state a civil penalty of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars and not more than five hundred thousand dollars for each violation if the person distributes, dispenses, displays for sale, offers for sale, attempts to sell, or sells the product to a minor under the age of eighteen and the person is at least eighteen years of age and at least two years older than the minor.

Any person who violates section 6-16-111 (1)(a) to (1)(g) shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars for each violation, with a cap of three million dollars for a related series of violations. In determining a civil penalty under this subsection (1)(f), the court shall adjust the limitations cap for inflation based on the cumulative annual adjustment for inflation for each full year since August 10, 2016. The adjustments made under this subsection (1)(f)(I) are rounded upward or downward to the nearest ten-dollar increment. As used in this subsection (1)(f)(I), "inflation" means the annual percentage change in the United States department of labor's bureau of labor statistics consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items paid by all urban consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index.

Any civil penalty recovered under this paragraph (f) is paid to the attorney general and held as custodial money. The attorney general shall petition the district court having jurisdiction over the underlying civil enforcement action for approval to grant the custodial money to a charity in accordance with the cy pres doctrine within two years after receipt by the attorney general.

For accounting purposes, a fine or penalty received by the state under this article 1 is a damage award.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 376, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-9.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 351, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 359, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(3) added, p. 1107, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-054), ch. 138, p. 596, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(1)(d) added, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1406, § 33, effective June 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(d) amended and (1)(e) added, (HB 14-1037), ch. 358, p. 1682, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

(1)(f) added, (HB 16-1129), ch. 262, p. 1075, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(1)(f)(I) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1694, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended and (2) added, (HB 19-1289), ch. 268, p. 2516, § 3, effective May 23.

6-1-113. Civil actions - damages - other relief - class actions.

The provisions of this article shall be available in a civil action for any claim against any person who has engaged in or caused another to engage in any deceptive trade practice listed in this article. An action under this section shall be available to any person who:

Is an actual or potential consumer of the defendant's goods, services, or property and is injured as a result of such deceptive trade practice, or is a residential subscriber, as defined in section 6-1-903 (9), who receives unlawful telephone solicitation, as defined in section 6-1-903 (10); or

Is any successor in interest to an actual consumer who purchased the defendant's goods, services, or property; or

In the course of the person's business or occupation, is injured as a result of such deceptive trade practice.

Except in a class action or a case brought for a violation of section 6-1-709, and notwithstanding any other law, any person who, in a private civil action, is found to have engaged in or caused another to engage in any deceptive trade practice listed in this article 1 is liable in an amount equal to the sum of:

The greater of:

The amount of actual damages sustained, including prejudgment interest of either eight percent per year or at the rate provided in section 13-21-101, whichever is greater, from the date the claim under this article 1 accrued; or

Five hundred dollars; or

Three times the amount of actual damages sustained, if it is established by clear and convincing evidence that such person engaged in bad faith conduct; plus

In the case of any successful action to enforce said liability, the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court.

(2.3) As used in subsection (2) of this section, "bad faith conduct" means fraudulent, willful, knowing, or intentional conduct that causes injury.

(2.5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, in the case of any violation of section 6-1-709, in addition to interest, costs of the action, and reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court, the prevailing party shall be entitled only to damages in an amount sufficient to refund moneys actually paid for a manufactured home not delivered in accordance with the provisions of section 6-1-709.

(2.7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, in the case of any violation of section 6-1-105 (1)(ss), the court may award reasonable costs of the action and attorney fees and interest, and in addition, the prevailing party shall be entitled only to damages in an amount sufficient to refund moneys actually paid for the installation of a manufactured home not installed in accordance with the provisions of part 33 of article 32 of title 24, C.R.S., that apply to the installation of manufactured homes.

(2.9) In a case certified as a class action, a successful plaintiff may recover actual damages, injunctive relief allowed by law, and reasonable attorney fees and costs.

Any person who brings an action under this article 1 that is found by the court to be frivolous, groundless and in bad faith, or for the purpose of harassment shall be liable to the defendant for the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court.

Costs and attorney fees shall be awarded to the attorney general or a district attorney in all actions where the attorney general or the district attorney successfully enforces this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 376, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-12.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 446, § 5, effective April 17.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 360, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 98:

IP(2) amended and (2.5) added, p. 748, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 636, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2000:

(2.7) added, p. 1162, § 4, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1461, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(2.7) amended, p. 550, § 4, effective March 5.

L. 2019:

IP(2), (2)(a)(I), and (3) amended, (HB 19-1289), ch. 268, p. 2517, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2022:

(2.9) added, (HB 22-1071), ch. 36, p. 190, § 1, effective August 10.

6-1-114. Criminal penalties.

Any person who promotes a pyramid promotional scheme in this state commits a class 1 misdemeanor, as defined in section 18-1.3-501. Any person who violates article 230 of title 12 or section 6-1-701 or 6-1-717 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 620, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 55-5-14.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 820, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 231, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 654, § 7, effective May 18.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1465, § 11, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1728, § 6, effective June 1; entire section amended, p. 809, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1879, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-228), ch. 271, p. 1425, § 3, effective May 24; entire section amended, (SB 13-238), ch. 401, p. 2349, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1644, § 9, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3134, § 56, effective March 1, 2022.

6-1-115. Limitations.

All actions brought under this article must be commenced within three years after the date on which the false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice occurred or the date on which the last in a series of such acts or practices occurred or within three years after the consumer discovered or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should have discovered the occurrence of the false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice. The period of limitation provided in this section may be extended for a period of one year if the plaintiff proves that failure to timely commence the action was caused by the defendant engaging in conduct calculated to induce the plaintiff to refrain from or postpone the commencement of the action.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 360, § 10, effective July 1.

6-1-116. Investigation of unfair business practices by regulated persons - district attorney requests for records from licensing authorities - interagency agreements with attorney general - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

Federal and state consumer protection and unfair trade laws, such as those prohibiting unfair or deceptive trade practices, price fixing, and monopolization, exist to protect consumers against unfair business practices that undermine fair competition, a thriving small business sector, and consumers' rights to make informed economic decisions;

District attorneys and the attorney general are tasked with, and have the expertise needed for, enforcing consumer protection laws in the state;

A licensing authority might have information relevant to a complaint alleging that a person that the licensing authority regulates has committed unfair or deceptive trade practices; and

Therefore, it best serves the consumer protection interests of the state to allow a licensing authority to share with a district attorney or the attorney general information regarding a regulated person, which information may be relevant to a consumer protection investigation of the regulated person.

Upon receiving a complaint alleging a violation of the consumer protection laws set forth in this article 1, a district attorney may request records from a licensing authority regarding a person that is the subject of the complaint if the complaint alleges that:

The complainant suffered damages in an amount of at least twenty thousand dollars and the district attorney determines the amount of damages alleged appears to be a reasonable amount in relation to the alleged conduct forming the basis of the complaint; or

Two or more persons regulated by the licensing authority jointly engaged in conduct that forms the basis of the complaint.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law that may prohibit a licensing authority from complying with this subsection (2), to facilitate the district attorney's investigation into and enforcement of the complaint, a licensing authority shall provide the district attorney with copies of, or access to inspect, the records requested if the licensing authority has already determined it will not take action against the regulated person or persons.

This subsection (2) does not apply to a person regulated by a board or commission.

In addition to the costs and attorney fees that the regulated person or persons complained of are entitled to recover from the complainant pursuant to section 6-1-113 (3), if a court determines that the complaint is frivolous, groundless, and was filed in bad faith, or if the regulated person or persons prevail or substantially prevail in the matter, the court's order may also require the complainant to pay the regulated person's or persons' costs incurred, actual damages sustained, and reasonable attorney fees incurred in relation to:

The district attorney's or attorney general's investigation of the matter; and

The licensing authority's investigation of a complaint against the regulated person or persons if the court determines that the two complaints were filed by the same complainant and in regard to the same matter.

Subject to approval by the head of an executive department, a state licensing authority within the department may enter into an interagency agreement with the attorney general or the attorney general's designee for the referral of any complaint that appears to allege a violation of this article 1 or article 2 or 4 of this title 6. The interagency agreement may provide for referrals of complaints, information sharing, confidentiality requirements, and other terms that facilitate the investigation and enforcement of complaints alleging violations of consumer protection or unfair trade laws.

Any copies of records that a licensing authority sends to a district attorney, the attorney general, or the attorney general's designee pursuant to this section are records of the investigation of a prosecuting attorney pursuant to section 24-72-204 (2)(a)(I) and are not subject to the right of inspection under the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"District attorney" includes the district attorney and the chief deputy district attorneys, special deputy district attorneys, deputy district attorneys, and assistant district attorneys that the district attorney appoints pursuant to part 2 of article 1 of title 20.

"Licensing authority" means a state licensing authority or a local licensing authority.

"Local licensing authority" means the governing body of a statutory or home rule municipality, county, or city and county that is authorized to issue or approve a local license to a regulated person or for an activity.

"State licensing authority" means a department or division of the state that is authorized to issue to or approve a state license for a regulated person, which state license only authorizes the licensee to perform activities at specific premises.

"State licensing authority" does not include any board or commission.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-157), ch. 154, p. 980, § 1, effective August 10.